src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ==========================================================================
!! # North Saami adjective declension file
! ==========================================================================



!! ## Bisyllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -



LEXICON BUORRE  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  For this adj only
! Positive
              :%>X7     NomVadj             "good A" ;
              :%>X1     EssVadj             "good A" ;
       +Use/NG:%>X7     EssVadj                      ;
              :%>       GOAHTI-OBLadj       "good A" ;
!   +Use/-Spell:         VUOHTA                       ; ! buorevuohtaf

! Comparative and superlative
         +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X8b    BUStem                       ;
       +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X8muss BUOREMUS                     ;

! Derivation and compounding
   +Use/-Spell:»X7     NAMAT                        ; ! comp-only adj. Here since buorre has no Attr, not compound.
   +Use/-Spell:»X7#     NAMATLAGANLAGASCont          ;
! #+Use/-Spell:»X7     NAMAT                        ; ! comp-only adj. Here since buorre has no Attr
+Use/Circ+Cmp#:»X7#     ALIT                         ; ! both comp and independent adj. Here for ditto reason.

LEXICON BUOROT  !!≈ * **@CODE@** SUB, Southern dialect

 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>buorot K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>buorot K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>buorot K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>buorot K ;


LEXICON ALKI  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyll V-Adj, -es-Attr, no WeG.
 :%>W2s ATTR ;
 +Err/Orth:%>s ATTR ; !álkis
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%> BU/MUS ; ! no CG in comparative?

LEXICON SEARRA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr in WeG.
 :%>W1s ATTR ;
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON HOHPI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 :%>X4s ATTR ; ! X4 => WeG, not W1 => no vow ch
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :%> ADVV ;

LEXICON LAIKI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj's with es-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 :%>W1s ATTR ;
 +Err/Orth:%>s ATTR ;
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :%> ADVV ;

LEXICON LODJI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** bisyll V-Adj with -es and -is Attr in WeG
 :%>X4s ATTR ; ! #lojis
 +Use/NG:%>W1s ATTR ; ! #lojes
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :%> ADVV ;
! LODJI combines HOHPI and LAIKI. Hohpi now redirected here

!LEXICON VEADDJI ! bisyll, s Attr, no CG
!K ; ne, det er JUHKKIS som er riktig leksikon.

LEXICON JUHKKIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj. with s-Attr; no Adv.
 :s ATTR ;
 : ACTORCT ;
! :%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these
 +Use/-PLX:htti¤%> VUOHTA    ; ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation


LEXICON HAHTTI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv. !sponsors wants comparatives for these!
 :htti¤%> ATTR ;
 :htti¤ ACTORCT ;
 :htti¤%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +Attr+Err/Orth:hti¤%> K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:hti¤%> K ;
 +Use/-PLX:htti¤%> VUOHTA    ; ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON EADDJI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv.
 :%> ATTR ;
  ACTORLONGSHORTCT ;
! :%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these


LEXICON NUORRA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adj. w/CG, w/o Sep. Attr; no Adv.
 :%> ATTR ;
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON RIEKTA  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyll adj w/o obl sg forms, WeG Attr
 +Dial/-KJ:a%> ATTR ;     ! riekta
 +Use/NG:e%>X4s ATTR ;  ! rievttes
 +Dial/-GG:e%>X9s ATTR ;  ! rivttes
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Err/Orth:as%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +Err/Orth:a%> BU/MUS ; !riektabut, riektamus 
 +Dial/-GG:ás%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +Dial/-KJ+Der2+Der/Comp+A:a%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Dial/-KJ+Der2+Der/Superl+A:a%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Use/-Spell:a  VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON VIELG  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 :e%>Y9s¤ ATTR ;
 :ad VIELGAT ;

LEXICON VIELGAT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  just a sublexicon to VIELG
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
 :»X7# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
! +Cmp/SgNom#+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.

LEXICON VIELG_NOCOMP  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 :e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 :ad VIELGAT_NOCOMP ;

LEXICON VIELGAT_NOCOMP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  just a sublexicon to VIELG_NOCOMP
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
  NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
! +Cmp/SgNom#+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.

LEXICON RIEKTAT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -at final adj with attr -es and -dis
 +Err/Orth:ag JOHTIL ;
 CAHKK ;

LEXICON CAHKK !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -at final adj with attr -es and -dis
 +Use/NG:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 :ad JOHTIL ;

LEXICON JALGAT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  only jalgat, attr jalga and jalges
 :%>a ATTR ;
 VIELG ;

LEXICON UHCC !!≈ * **@CODE@**  uhcci, unni, seaggi, attr uhca, unna, seakka
 +Err/Orth:i%> BU/MUS ;
 UNN ;

LEXICON UNN !!≈ * **@CODE@**  uhcci, unni, seaggi, attr uhca, unna, seakka
 :a%>W1 ATTR ;
 :i%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :i%> VUOHTA    ; ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation
 :i%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :i%>X4 GOADIadj- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Sg+Gen:i%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:i%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:i%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Loc:i%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:i%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4k K ;
 :i%>^DISIMP GODIIadj- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Err/Orth:i%> GOAHTE- ;	!
 :i%> GOAHTI-NEadj ;


LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI !!≈ * **@CODE@**  caritives
 :%>is ATTR ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>in K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 :%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Err/Orth:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>eamit K ;
! :%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva:» UVVA_IV ;
 +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BIVNNUHEAPME  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  no bivnnuhis here, special, beacause popular and unpopular collide in attribute form :)
! +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! is this correct? bivnnuhin ?
 +Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 :%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Err/Orth:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! :%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva:» UVVA_IV ;
 +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
