src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective !!= * **@CODE@** is a long list of lexicalised eahpe-prefixed adjs
eahperiekta+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:eahpe#riekºt RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
eahpegánnihahtti+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:eahpe#gánniha HAHTTI ;
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
agibeaibuorre+A+Sem/Dummytag:agi#beai#buorri BUORRE ;
bassi+A+Sem/Dummytag:bassi NUORRA ;
berostahtti+A+Sem/Dummytag:be7rosta HAHTTI ;
bivnnuheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bivnnuh BIVNNUHEAPME ;
buorre+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag: BUOROT ; ! !lexeme in e
buorrindoalli+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:buorri7n#doalla¤ EADDJI ;
purpolruoksat+A+Sem/Dummytag:purpol#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
báddebahá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bádde7#bahá HOHPI ;
báddelodji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bádde#lodºji LODJI ;
dierbi+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dierºbi LAIKI ;
doaivvohahtti+A+Sem/Dummytag:doaivvoha HAHTTI ;
duollat+A+Sem/Dummytag:duoll CAHKK ;
duskkiheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duskki7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
eaibahá+A+Err/Lex+Sem/Dummytag:eai#bahá HOHPI ;
eanaráddjejeaddji+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:eana#ráddjejeaddji¤ EADDJI ;
monotona+A+Sem/Dummytag:monotona NUORRA ;
fiskesruškat+A+Sem/Dummytag:fiskes#rušk VIELG_NOCOMP ;
fivlat+A+Sem/Dummytag:fivl VIELG ;
fuođđi+A+Sem/Dummytag:fuođºđi LAIKI ;
geampa+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:geamºpa SEARRA ;
geađđat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:geađđ CAHKK ;
gievra+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gievºra SEARRA ;
ruhtagievra+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ruhta#gievºra SEARRA ;
gilvvihahtti+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:gilvve7ha HAHTTI ;
goardu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:goarºdu LODJI ;
godjat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:godj CAHKK ;
guohttu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guohºtu¤ JUHKKIS ;
guvgesruoksat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guvges#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
gužžaláiki+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gužža#lájºki LAIKI ;
gárrenvuođaeastadeaddji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gárrenvuođa#eastadeaddji¤ EADDJI ;
hillji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hillji LODJI ; !
hohpi+A+Sem/Dummytag:hohºpi HOHPI ;
hárjjeheapme+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:hárjji7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
hávski+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hávski ALKI ; !
iešbuorre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ieš#buorri BUORRE ;
jalgat+A+Sem/Dummytag:jalg JALGAT ;
jalla+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jalºla SEARRA ;
jaskat+A+Sem/Dummytag:jask VIELG ;
jiešbuorre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jieš#buorri BUORRE ;
joallu+A+Sem/Dummytag:joallu LAIKI ;
jállu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jállu LODJI ; !
kievra+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kievºra SEARRA ;
lievllisteaddji+A+Sem/Dummytag:lievllisteaddji¤ EADDJI ;
loažžat+A+Sem/Dummytag:loažž CAHKK ;
lodji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lodºji LODJI "tame A" ;
lávlu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lávºlu¤ JUHKKIS ;
maritiibma+A+Sem/Dummytag:maritijbma NUORRA ;
mearkkahahtti+A+Sem/Dummytag:mearkkaha HAHTTI ;
máisttoheapme+A+Sem/Dummytag:máisttoh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
njoammu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:njoammu¤ JUHKKIS ;
karmosinruoksat+A+Sem/Dummytag:karmosin#ruoks VIELG ; ! red
rahkki+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:rahºka¤ JUHKKIS ;
relevánta+A+Sem/Dummytag:relevánºta NUORRA ;
riekta+A+Sem/Dummytag:riekºt RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
riektat+A+Sem/Dummytag:riekt RIEKTAT ;
ruoksájeaddji+A+Sem/Dummytag:ruoksájeaddji¤ EADDJI ;
ruoná+A+Sem/Dummytag:ruoná NUORRA ;
rusá+A+Sem/Dummytag:rusá NUORRA ;
ruššu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ruššu HOHPI ; !
ráfeheapme+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:ráfi7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
ráilu+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:rájºlu LAIKI ;
seaggi+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:seagg UHCC ;
searra+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:searra SEARRA ;
seaŋggabuorre+A+Sem/Dummytag:seaŋgga#buorri BUORRE ;
siidalodji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:siida#lodºji LODJI ;
smurtačáhppat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:smurta#čáhpp VIELG_NOCOMP ;
somá+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:somá HOHPI ; !
stargat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:starg CAHKK ;
udju+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:udºju HOHPI ;
veaddji+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:veadºji¤ JUHKKIS ;
vearjjoheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vearjjoh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
vielgat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vielg VIELG ;
viidnejuhkki+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:viidne#juhºka¤ JUHKKIS ;
vuollálasti+A+Sem/Dummytag:vuollálasti NUORRA ;
vávjjehahtti+A+Sem/Dummytag:vávjjeha HAHTTI ;
álki+A+Sem/Dummytag:álki ALKI ;
áššeguoski+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ášše#guoski¤ EADDJI ;
čuvgesfiskat+A+Sem/Dummytag:čuvges#fisk VIELG_NOCOMP ;
šlundi+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:šlunºdi LAIKI ;
šoavkat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:šoavk VIELG ;
